Utah statutes.
58-60-307.   Marriage and family therapist supervisors -- Qualifications.

(1)  Each person acting as a marriage and family therapist supervisor shall:

(a)  have at least two years of clinical experience as a marriage and family therapist since the date of first licensure as a marriage and family therapist; and

(b)  either:

(i)  be approved as a supervisor by a national marriage and family therapist professional organization; or

(ii)  meet the criteria established by rule.

(2)  Persons who act as a supervisor without meeting the requirements of this section are subject to discipline for unprofessional conduct.

